Maryland, session 2026, HB1643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
20–606.
(G) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) 1. “SAFETY–SENSITIVE EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN
EMPLOYEE WITH RESPONSIBILITIES THAT IF PERFORMED WHILE IMPAIRED COULD
RESULT IN IMMEDIATE PHYSICAL HARM TO A STUDENT OR ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1643*

HOUSE BILL 1643
2. “SAFETY–SENSITIVE EMPLOYEE” INCLUDES
TRANSPORTATION AND SECURITY PERSONNEL.
3. “SAFETY–SENSITIVE EMPLOYEE” DOES NOT INCLUDE
A SCHOOL EMPLOYEE WHO IS CHARGED WITH SCHOOL OR CLASSROOM–BASED
SUPERVISION.
(III) “SCHOOL” MEANS AN INSTITUTION OF ELEMENTARY,
SECONDARY, OR HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO SAFETY–SENSITIVE
EMPLOYEES.
(3) A SCHOOL MAY NOT:
(I) FAIL OR REFUSE TO HIRE AN APPLICANT FOR EMPLOYMENT
BECAUSE OF THE APPLICANT’S LEGAL USE OF CANNABIS;
(II) DISCRIMINATE AGAINST AN EMPLOYEE WITH RESPECT TO
THE EMPLOYEE’S COMPENSATION, OR THE TERMS, CONDITIONS, OR PRIVILEGES OF
EMPLOYMENT BECAUSE OF THE EMPLOYEE’S LEGAL USE OF CANNABIS:
1. OUTSIDE THE WORKPLACE;
2. OUTSIDE OF WORK HOURS; AND
3. WITHOUT THE USE OF THE SCHOOL’S EQUIPMENT OR
PROPERTY;
(III) LIMIT, SEGREGATE, OR CLASSIFY AN APPLICANT FOR
EMPLOYMENT IN ANY WAY THAT WOULD DEPRIVE OR TEND TO DEPRIVE THE
APPLICANT OF EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES BECAUSE OF THE APPLICANT’S
LEGAL USE OF CANNABIS; OR
(IV) LIMIT, SEGREGATE, OR CLASSIFY AN EMPLOYEE IN ANY WAY
THAT WOULD DEPRIVE OR TEND TO DEPRIVE THE EMPLOYEE OF EMPLOYMENT
OPPORTUNITIES OR OTHERWISE ADVERSELY AFFECT THE EMPLOYEE’S STATUS AS
AN EMPLOYEE BECAUSE OF THE EMPLOYEE’S LEGAL USE OF CANNABIS:
1. OUTSIDE THE WORKPLACE;
2. OUTSIDE OF WORK HOURS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1643 3
3. WITHOUT THE USE OF THE SCHOOL’S EQUIPMENT OR
PROPERTY.
(4) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) AUTHORIZES AN EMPLOYEE TO BE IMPAIRED BY, TO USE, OR
TO POSSESS CANNABIS PRODUCTS DURING WORK HOURS;
(II) REQUIRES A SCHOOL TO TAKE AN ACTION THAT WOULD:
1. CAUSE THE SCHOOL TO VIOLATE FEDERAL LAW OR
REGULATIONS; OR
2. RESULT IN THE LOSS OF A MONETARY OR
LICENSING–RELATED BENEFIT UNDER FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATIONS; OR
(III) PROHIBITS A SCHOOL FROM:
1. ADOPTING POLICIES AND PROCEDURES THAT
PROHIBIT AN EMPLOYEE FROM PERFORMING DUTIES WHILE IMPAIRED BY
CANNABIS;
2. PROHIBITING AN EMPLOYEE FROM POSSESSING OR
USING CANNABIS DURING WORK HOURS; OR
3. TAKING AN ADVERSE EMPLOYMENT ACTION AGAINST
AN EMPLOYEE FOR POSSESSING OR USING CANNABIS DURING WORK HOURS.
(5) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT PREEMPT ANY FEDERAL LAW
REQUIRING APPLICANTS OR EMPLOYEES TO BE TESTED FOR CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCES AS A CONDITION OF:
(I) EMPLOYMENT;
(II) RECEIVING FEDERAL FUNDING OR FEDERAL
LICENSING–RELATED BENEFITS; OR
(III) ENTERING INTO A FEDERAL CONTRACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.